West Virginia, session 2025, SB734.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 15A. The A. James Manchin Rehabilitation Environmental Action Plan. §22-15A-21. Procurement of recycled products. [Repealed].NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal the section describing procuring recycled products in the A. James Manchin Rehabilitation Action Plan. Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home